Florida, session 2026, HB939.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraph (c) of subsection (2) of section
119.0712, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
119.0712 Executive branch agency-specific exemptions from
inspection or copying of public records.—
(2) DEPARTMENT OF HIGHWAY SAFETY AND MOTOR VEHICLES.—
(c) E-mail addresses collected by the Department of
Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles pursuant to s. 319.40(3), s.
320.95(2), or s. 322.08(10), or s. 328.30(3) are exempt from s.
119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. This
exemption applies retroactively. This paragraph is subject to
the Open Government Sunset Review Act in accordance with s.
119.15 and shall stand repealed on October 2, 2031, unless
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb939-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 939 2026
reviewed and saved from repeal through reenactment by the
Legislature.
Section 2. The Legislature finds that it is a public
necessity that e-mail addresses collected by the Department of
Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles for the use of e-mail in lieu
of the United States Postal Service as a method of notification
be made exempt from s. 119.07(1), Florida Statutes, and s.
24(a), Article I of the State Constitution. Sections 319.40(3),
320.95(2), and 322.08(10), Florida Statutes, authorize the
department to collect e-mail addresses and use e-mail in lieu of
the United States Postal Service to provide title certification
notification and renewal notices related to motor vehicle
license plates, driver licenses, and identification cards. The
department is also authorized to collect e-mail addresses and
use e-mail in lieu of the United States Postal Service to
provide renewal notices related to vessel registrations under s.
328.30(3), Florida Statutes. HB 937 expands the circumstances in
which e-mail addresses may be used in lieu of the United States
Postal Service by authorizing e-mail to be used as a method of
notification for various notices and orders issued by the
department in addition to renewal notices, including, but not
limited to, notices related to driver licenses, identification
cards, motor vehicle registrations, motor vehicle title
certificates, vessel registrations, and orders to revoke,
cancel, or suspend driver licenses. The department's use of e-
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb939-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 939 2026
mail as a method for corresponding with customers has steadily
increased in recent years. An e-mail address is unique to each
individual and, when combined with other personal identifying
information, may be used for identity theft, consumer scams,
unwanted solicitations, or other invasive contact. The public
availability of personal e-mail addresses puts the department's
customers at increased risk of these problems. Such risk may be
significantly limited by making such e-mail addresses exempt.
The Legislature finds that such risk outweighs this state's
public policy favoring open government.
Section 3. This act shall take effect on the same date
that HB 937 or similar legislation takes effect, if such
legislation is adopted in the same legislative session or an
extension thereof and becomes a law.
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb939-00